zh-TW: 吉他調音弦鈕按鈕形狀: 奶油豆形; 梯形; 迷你; 橢圓形; 鬱金香形; 翼形; 其他
pl: Kształt guzika klucza gitarowego: Fasolka (butterbean); Trapez; Mini; Owal; Tulipan; Skrzydło; Inne
sv: Form på gitarrstämskruvarnas rattar: Butterbean; Keystone; Mini; Oval; Tulpan; Vinge; Övrigt
pt-PT: Forma do botão do cravelho da guitarra: Butterbean; Keystone; Mini; Oval; Tulipa; Asa; Outro
ja: ギターチューニングペグのボタンShapes: バタービーン; キーストーン; ミニ; オーバル; チューリップ; ウィング; その他
hr-HR: Oblik gumba za podešavanje gitare: Butterbean; Keystone; Mini; Ovalne; Tulipan; Krilo; Ostalo
ko: 기타 튜닝 페그 버튼 Shapes: 버터빈; 키스톤; Mini; 타원형; 튤립; 윙; 기타
bg-BG: Форма на бутона на ключа за настройване на китарата: Зърно (Butterbean); Ключов камък (Keystone); Мини; Овал; Лале; Крило; Други
fr: Forme du bouton de mécanique de guitare: Haricot; Clé de voûte; Mini; Ovale; Tulipe; Aile; Autre
el: Σχήμα μπουτόν κλειδιών κιθάρας: Butterbean; Keystone; Mini; Οβάλ; Tulip; Wing; Άλλο
ro-RO: Forma butonului cheiței de acordare a chitarei.: Butterbean; Keystone; Mini; Oval; Lalea; Aripă; Altele
th: รูปทรงปุ่มลูกบิดปรับสายกีตาร์: บัตเตอร์บีน; คีย์สโตน; มินิ; วงรี; ทิวลิป; ปีก; อื่นๆ
vi: Hình dạng nút chỉnh dây đàn guitar: Hạt đậu; Keystone; Mini; Bầu dục; Hoa tulip; Cánh; Khác
nb: Gitar stemmeskrueform: Butterbean; Keystone; Mini; Oval; Tulipan; Vinge; Annet
hu: Gitárhangoló gomb alakja: Butterbean; Keystone; Mini; Ovális; Tulipán; Szárnyas; Egyéb
da: Form på knop til guitarens stemmeskrue: Butterbean; Keystone; Mini; Oval; Tulipan; Vinge; Andet
de: Form der Gitarrenwirbelknöpfe: Butterbean; Keystone; Mini; Oval; Tulip; Wing; Sonstige
sl-SI: Oblika gumba kitarskega vijaka za uglasitev: Oblika fižola; Oblika trapeza; Mini; Ovalna; Oblika tulipana; Oblika krila; Drugo
it: Forma del bottone della meccanica della chitarra: Butterbean; Keystone; Mini; Ovale; Tulipano; Ad aletta; Altro
tr: Gitar akort burgusu düğme şekli: Butterbean; Kilit taşı; Mini; Oval; Lale; Kanat; Diğer
sk-SK: Tvar koncovky ladiaceho kolíka gitary: Butterbean; Keystone; Mini; Oválne; Tulipán; Krídlo; Iné
pt-BR: Guitarra tarraxa botão formato: Feijão (Butterbean); Keystone; Mini; Oval; Tulipa; Asa; Outro
ru: Форма кнопки колка гитары: Фасоль (butterbean); Трапеция (keystone); Мини; Овал; Тюльпан; Крыло; Другое
zh-CN: 吉他弦钮旋钮形状: 扁豆形; 梯形; 迷你; 椭圆形; 郁金香形; 翼形; 其他
lt-LT: Gitaros derinimo kaiščio rankenėlės forma: Pupelės formos; Trapecijos formos („Keystone“); Mini; Ovalios; Tulpės formos; Sparno formos; Kita
fi: Kitaran viritysnupin muoto: Voipapu; Keystone; Mini; Ovaali; Tulppaani; Siipi; Muu
es: Forma de botón de las clavijas de la guitarra: Frijol; Trapezoidal; Mini; Ovalada; Tulipán; Ala; Otra
cs: Tvar tlačítka ladicího kolíčku kytary: Fazole; Keystone; Mini; Oválné; Tulipán; Křídlo; Jiné
nl: Gitaar stemmechaniek knop vorm: Butterbean; Keystone; Mini; Ovaal; Tulp; Vleugel; Overig
en: Guitar tuning peg button shape: Butterbean; Keystone; Mini; Oval; Tulip; Wing; Other